Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. Charter Schools.

Administrative Code. —

For regulation relating to charter schools, see 4 AAC 3.110.

Sec. 14.03.250.
Application for charter school.

A local school board shall prescribe an application procedure for the establishment of a charter school in that school district. The application procedure must include provisions for an academic policy committee consisting of parents of students attending the school, teachers, and school employees and a proposed form for a contract between a charter school and the local school board, setting out the contract elements required under AS

14.03.255(c)

.

A decision of a local school board approving or denying an application for a charter school must be in writing, must be issued within 60 days after the application, and must include all relevant findings of fact and conclusions of law.

If a local school board approves an application for a charter school, the local school board shall forward the application to the state Board of Education and Early Development for review and approval.

If a local school board denies an application for a charter school, the applicant may appeal the denial to the commissioner. The appeal to the commissioner shall be filed not later than 60 days after the local school board issues its written decision of denial. The commissioner shall review the local school board’s decision to determine whether the findings of fact are supported by substantial evidence and whether the decision is contrary to law. A decision of the commissioner upholding the denial by the local school board may be appealed within 30 days to the state Board of Education and Early Development.

If the commissioner approves a charter school application, the commissioner shall forward the application to the state Board of Education and Early Development for review and approval. The application shall be forwarded not later than 30 days after the commissioner issues a written decision. The state Board of Education and Early Development shall exercise independent judgment in evaluating the application.

A local school board that denied an application for a charter school approved by the state board on appeal shall operate the charter school as provided in AS

14.03.255

—

14.03.290

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 2010; am § 9 ch 15 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as § 1, ch. 77, SLA 1995 and codified in 1995, at which time “AS

14.03.250

—

14.03.290

” was substituted for “this Act” in subsection (a), and “AS

14.03.255(c)

” was substituted for “sec 2(c) of this Act” in subsection (c).

In 2000, “state Board of Education and Early Development” was substituted for “state Board of Education” in accordance with sec. 104, ch. 21, SLA 2000.

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 15, SLA 2014, which repealed and reenacted this section, see 2014 House Journal 1434 — 1437.

Administrative Code. —

For special schools, see 4 AAC 33, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 19, 2010, in (a), deleted the second sentence, which read, “The state board of education and early development may not approve more than 60 charter schools to operate in the state at any one time.”

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, rewrote the section.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 56, ch. 15, SLA 2014, this section, as reenacted by sec. 9, ch. 15, SLA 2014, applies to “charter school applications filed with a local school board on or after July 1, 2014.”

Sec. 14.03.253.
Charter school application appeal.

In an appeal to the commissioner under AS

14.03.250

, the commissioner shall review the record before the local school board. The commissioner may request written supplementation of the record from the applicant or the local school board. The commissioner may

remand the appeal to the local school board for further review;

approve the charter school application and forward the application to the state Board of Education and Early Development with or without added conditions; or

uphold the decision denying the charter school application; if the commissioner upholds a local school board’s decision to deny a charter school application and the applicant appeals to the State Board of Education and Early Development, the commissioner shall immediately forward the application and record to the state Board of Education and Early Development.

In an appeal to the state Board of Education and Early Development of a denial of a charter school application under (a)(3) of this section, the state board shall determine, based on the record, whether the commissioner’s findings are supported by substantial evidence and whether the decision is contrary to law. The state board shall issue a written decision within 90 days after an appeal.

History.

(§ 10 ch 15 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 15, SLA 2014, see 2014 House Journal 1434 — 1437.

Effective dates. —

Section 62, ch. 15, SLA 2014 makes this section effective July 1, 2014.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 56, ch. 15, SLA 2014, this section, enacted by sec. 10, ch. 15, SLA 2014, applies to “charter school applications filed with a local school board on or after July 1, 2014.”

Sec. 14.03.255.
Organization and operation of a charter school.

A charter school operates as a school in the local school district except that the charter school (1) is exempt from the local school district’s textbook, program, curriculum, and scheduling requirements; (2) is exempt from AS

14.14.130(c)

; the principal of the charter school shall be selected by the academic policy committee and shall select, appoint, or otherwise supervise employees of the charter school; and (3) operates under the charter school’s annual program budget as set out in the contract between the local school board and the charter school under (c) of this section. A local school board may exempt a charter school from other local school district requirements if the exemption is set out in the contract. A charter school is subject to tests required by the department.

A charter school shall

keep financial records of the charter school;

oversee the operation of the charter school to ensure that the terms of the contract required by (c) of this section are being met;

meet regularly with parents and with teachers of the charter school to review, evaluate, and improve operations of the charter school; and

meet with the academic policy committee at least once each year to monitor progress in achieving the committee’s policies and goals.

A charter school shall operate under a contract between the charter school and the local school board. A contract must contain the following provisions:

a description of the educational program;

specific levels of achievement for the education program;

admission policies and procedures;

administrative policies;

a statement of the charter school’s funding allocation from the local school board and costs assignable to the charter school program budget;

the method by which the charter school will account for receipts and expenditures;

the location and description of the facility;

the name of the teacher, or teachers, who, by agreement between the charter school and the teacher, will teach in the charter school;

the teacher-to-student ratio;

the number of students served;

the term of the contract, not to exceed a term of 10 years;

a termination clause providing that the contract may be terminated by the local school board for the failure of the charter school to meet educational achievement goals or fiscal management standards, or for other good cause;

a statement that the charter school will comply with all state and federal requirements for receipt and use of public money;

other requirements or exemptions agreed upon by the charter school and the local school board.

A school district shall offer to a charter school the right of first refusal for a lease of space in an existing school district facility or in a facility within the school district that is not currently being used as a public school, if the chief school administrator determines the facility meets requirements for health and safety applicable to public buildings or other public schools in the district. If the school district requires lease payments by a charter school, the school district shall negotiate a lease agreement with the charter school for an amount that does not exceed the true operational costs calculated on a square foot basis for space leased under this subsection.

History.

(§ 2 ch 77 SLA 1995; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 70 SLA 2001; am §§ 11, 12 ch 15 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as § 2, ch. 77, SLA 1995. Codified in 1995.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (a), rewrote the third sentence, which read, “A charter school is subject to secondary school competency testing as provided in AS

14.03.075

and other competency tests required by the department.”; in (d), in the first sentence, substituted “A school district shall offer to a charter school the right of first refusal for a lease of space” for “A charter school may be operated”, and added the last sentence.

Sec. 14.03.260.
Funding for charter school.

A local school board shall provide an approved charter school with an annual program budget. The budget shall be not less than the amount generated by the students enrolled in the charter school less administrative costs retained by the local school district, determined by applying the indirect cost rate approved by the department up to four percent. Costs directly related to charter school facilities, including rent, utilities, and maintenance, may not be included in an annual program budget for the purposes of calculating the four percent cap on administrative costs under this subsection. A local school board shall provide a charter school with a report itemizing the administrative costs retained by the local school board under this section. The “amount generated by students enrolled in the charter school” is to be determined in the same manner as it would be for a student enrolled in another public school in that school district and includes funds generated by grants, appropriations, federal impact aid, the required local contribution, the local contribution under AS

14.17.410(c)

, special needs under AS

14.17.420(a)(1)

, and secondary school vocational and technical instruction under AS

14.17.420(a)(3)

. A school district shall direct state aid under AS 14.11 for the construction or major maintenance of a charter school facility to the charter school that generated the state aid, subject to the same terms and conditions that apply to state aid under AS 14.11 for construction or major maintenance of a school facility that is not a charter school.

The program budget of a charter school is to be used for operating expenses of the educational program of the charter school, including purchasing textbooks, classroom materials, and instructional aids.

The charter school shall provide the financial and accounting information requested by the local school board or the Department of Education and Early Development and shall cooperate with the local school district or the department in complying with the requirements of AS

14.17.910

.

The expenses of housing nonresident students who attend the charter school, including room, board, and other reasonable housing expenses, may not be paid for with state money but may be paid for with funds contributed by sources other than the state.

History.

(§ 3 ch 77 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 113 SLA 1997; am § 11 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 13 ch 15 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as § 3, ch. 77, SLA 1995. Codified in 1995.

In 1999, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in (a) and (c) of this section in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to funding of charter schools having small student population counts, with average student memberships of not more than 150 students, see AS

14.17.450(c)

, (d), and (f).

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 15, SLA 2014, which amended (a) of this section, see 2014 House Journal 1434 — 1437.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (a), substituted “department up to four percent” for “Department of Education and Early Development” at the end of the first sentence, added the third and fourth sentences, in the fifth sentence, added the language beginning “and includes funds generated by grants, appropriations, federal impact aid” to the end of the sentence, and added the sixth sentence.

Sec. 14.03.263.
Charter school grant program. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 14.03.264.
Charter school grant program.

A charter school that is established on or after July 1, 2014 may receive a one-time grant from the department equal to the amount of $500 for each student enrolled in the school on October 1 of the first year in which the school applies for the grant. The charter school shall use a grant received under this section to provide educational services. In this subsection, “educational services” includes curriculum development, program development, and special education services.

The department shall establish by regulation procedures for the application for and expenditure of grant funds under (a) of this section.

If the amount appropriated in a fiscal year for the charter school grant program is insufficient to meet the amounts authorized under (a) of this section, the department shall reduce pro rata the per pupil grant amount by the necessary percentage as determined by the department. If a charter school grant is reduced under this subsection, the charter school may apply to the department in a subsequent fiscal year for the balance of the grant amount.

History.

(§ 14 ch 15 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 62, ch. 15, SLA 2014 makes this section effective July 1, 2014.

Sec. 14.03.265.
Admission.

The program of a charter school may be designed to serve

students within an age group or grade level;

students who will benefit from a particular teaching method or curriculum; or

nonresident students, including providing domiciliary services for students who need those services, if approved by the board.

A charter school shall enroll all eligible students who submit a timely application, unless the number of those applications exceeds the capacity of the program, class, grade level, or building. In the event of an excess of those applications, the charter school and the local school board shall attempt to accommodate all of those applicants by considering providing additional classroom space and assigning additional teachers from the district to the charter school. If it is not possible to accommodate all eligible students who submit a timely application, students shall be accepted by random drawing. A school board may not require a student to attend a charter school.

In addition to other requirements of law, a charter school shall be nonsectarian.

History.

(§ 4 ch 77 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 113 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as § 4, ch. 77, SLA 1995. Codified in 1995.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 9, ch. 77, SLA 1995, this section would have been repealed July 1, 2005; however, § 9, ch. 77, SLA 1995, was itself repealed by § 8, ch. 70, SLA 2001, effective July 1, 2001, which had the effect of continuing AS

14.03.265

in effect.

Sec. 14.03.270.
Teacher or employee transfers, evaluations, and negotiated agreements.

A teacher or employee may not be assigned to a charter school unless the teacher or employee consents to the assignment.

All provisions of an existing negotiated agreement or collective bargaining agreement applicable to a teacher or employee of a district apply to that teacher or employee if employed at a charter school in that district, unless the district and the bargaining unit representing the teacher or employee agree to an exemption.

A teacher in a charter school shall be evaluated in an equivalent manner as all other teachers in the district, except that if there is no administrator assigned to the charter school, the local school board, with the agreement of the charter school, shall designate a school district administrator in that district to evaluate a teacher in a charter school.

History.

(§ 5 ch 77 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as § 5, ch. 77, SLA 1995. Codified in 1995.

Sec. 14.03.275.
Contracts; duration.

A contract for a charter school may be for a term of no more than 10 years.

History.

(§ 6 ch 77 SLA 1995; am § 6 ch 70 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as § 6, ch. 77, SLA 1995. Codified in 1995.

Sec. 14.03.280.
Regulations.

The state Board of Education and Early Development may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) necessary to implement AS

14.03.250

—

14.03.290

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 77 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as § 7, ch. 77, SLA 1995. Codified in 1995, at which time “AS

14.03.250

—

14.03.290

” was substituted for “this Act.”

In 2000, “state Board of Education and Early Development” was substituted for “state Board of Education” in accordance with sec. 104, ch. 21, SLA 2000.

Administrative Code. —

For special schools, see 4 AAC 33, art. 1.

Sec. 14.03.290.
Definitions.

In AS

14.03.250

—

14.03.290

,

“academic policy committee” means the group designated to supervise the academic operation of a charter school and to ensure the fulfillment of the mission of a charter school;

“charter school” means a school established under AS

14.03.250

—

14.03.290

that operates within a public school district;

“local school board” means a borough or city school board or a school board of a regional educational attendance area;

“parent” means a biological, adoptive, or foster parent, or an adult who acts as guardian of a child and makes decisions related to the child’s safety, education, and welfare;

“teacher” means a person who serves a school district in a teaching, counseling, or administrative capacity and is required to be certificated in order to hold the position.

History.

(§ 8 ch 77 SLA 1995; am § 102 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as § 8, ch. 77, SLA 1995. Codified in 1995, at which time “AS

14.03.250

—

14.03.290

” was substituted for “this Act” in the introductory language and paragraph (2) to reflect the codification, and “school board of a regional educational attendance area” was substituted for “regional school board” in paragraph (3) to correct a manifest error in ch. 77, SLA 1995.

Paragraph (5) was formerly (6); renumbered in 2008 to reflect the repeal of former paragraph (5).

Administrative Code. —

For correspondence study programs, see 4 AAC 33, art. 4.